North Dakota, session 69, HB1503.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 39-08-01.2 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
2. An individual is guilty of criminal vehicular injury if the individual violates section 39-08-01 or
an equivalent ordinance and as a result that individual causes substantial bodily or serious
bodily injury to another individual. Violation of this subsection is a class CB felony. If an
individual violates this subsection, the court shall impose at least one year'syear and one
day's imprisonment. If the individual violates this section after having been previously
convicted of a violation of section 39-08-01 or 39-08-03 or an equivalent ordinance, the court
shall impose at least two years' imprisonment.

H. B. NO. 1503 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1503.
House Vote: Yeas 87 Nays 3 Absent 4
Senate Vote: Yeas 43 Nays 2 Absent 2
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State